Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-28] Appeals. (a) An appeal may
be taken from:

(1) An order denying a motion to compel arbitration;

(2) An order granting a motion to stay arbitration;

(3) An order confirming or denying confirmation of an
award;

(4) An order modifying or correcting an award;

(5) An order vacating an award without directing a
rehearing; or

(6) A final judgment entered pursuant to this
chapter.

(b) An appeal under this section shall be
taken as from an order or a judgment in a civil action. [L 2001, c 265, pt of
§1]

Case Notes

Where circuit court denied motion to confirm arbitration
award and remanded to arbitrator to rehear issue of appropriate remedy, the
order denying the motion was not an appealable order and the appellate court
lacked appellate jurisdiction under subsection (a). 123 H. 128 (App.), 230
P.3d 428 (2010).

Where arbitrator explicitly retained jurisdiction to decide
the merits of the case, stating in the arbitrator's determination that "I
hereby find and conclude that the class grievance is arbitrable on its merits
and this matter shall proceed to further arbitration for a determination on the
merits of a class grievance", the arbitrator's determination was not an
"award" pursuant to subsection (a)(3); thus, appeals court could not
review the appeal from the order granting motion to confirm arbitration as the
order was unappealable pursuant to subsection (a)(3). 124 H. 367 (App.), 244
P.3d 604 (2010).

Although public workers' union was not engaged in arbitration
proceedings at the time of the other public union's motion to compel
consolidated arbitration pursuant to §658A-7, as the core purpose of the other
public union's motion was to compel arbitration, appeals court had jurisdiction
under this section over other public union's appeal from order denying motion
for consolidated arbitration. 124 H. 372 (App.), 244 P.3d 609 (2010).

As subsection (a) authorizes an appeal from an order
confirming an award or from a final judgment entered pursuant to this chapter,
given the express language and plain meaning of this section and §658A-25,
appellants were authorized to appeal from either the order granting
confirmation or the final judgment; thus, appellants' notice of appeal was
timely with respect to the final judgment. 126 H. 179 (App.), 268 P.3d 432
(2012).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next